Utah statutes.
61-2-7.   Form of license -- Display of license.
The division shall issue to each licensee a wall license showing the name and
address of the licensee.  The seal of the state shall be affixed to each
license.  Each license shall contain any other matter prescribed by the
division and shall be delivered or mailed to the address furnished by the
licensee. The wall licenses of principal brokers, associate brokers, and sales
agents who are affiliated with an office shall be kept in the office to be
made available on request.
